Utah statutes.
59-2-1011.   Record of changes -- Form and contents of signed statement.
The county auditor shall make a record of all changes, corrections, and orders
and before October 15 shall affix a signed statement to the record, subscribed
by the auditor, in a form substantially as follows:
I, ____, do swear that, as county auditor of ____ county, I have kept correct
minutes of all acts of the county board of equalization regarding alterations
to the assessment rolls, that all alterations agreed to or directed to be made
have been made and entered on the rolls, and that no changes or alterations
have been made except those authorized by the board or the commission.
